Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE E. HEALTH CARE COUNCILS AND RESOURCE CENTERS

CHAPTER 119. TEXAS HEALTH IMPROVEMENT NETWORK

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 119.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "network" means the Texas Health Improvement Network established under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1123 (H.B. 3781), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Section 118.001 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(27), eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. NETWORK

Sec. 119.051. ESTABLISHMENT; PURPOSE.(a) The Texas Health Improvement Network is established to address urgent health care challenges and improve the health care system in this state and the nation and to develop, based on population health research, health care initiatives, policies, and best practices.

(b) The purpose of the network is to:

(1) reduce the per capita costs of health care;

(2) improve the individual experience of health care, including the quality of care and patient satisfaction; and

(3) improve the health of residents of this state.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1123 (H.B. 3781), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Section 118.051 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(27), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 119.052. COMPOSITION OF NETWORK. The network consists of experts in:

(1) general public health and other medical fields;

(2) mental health;

(3) nursing;

(4) pharmacy;

(5) social work;

(6) health economics;

(7) health policy and law;

(8) epidemiology;

(9) biostatistics;

(10) health informatics;

(11) health services research;

(12) engineering; and

(13) computer science.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1123 (H.B. 3781), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Section 118.052 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(27), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 119.053. DUTIES. (a) The network shall establish as its primary goals:

(1) evaluating and eliminating health disparities in this state, including racial, ethnic, geographic, and income-related or education-related disparities; and

(2) health care cost containment and the economic analysis of health policy.

(b) The network shall:

(1) function as an incubator and evaluator of health improvement practices; and

(2) support local communities in this state by offering leadership training, data analytics, community health assessments, and grant writing support to local communities.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1123 (H.B. 3781), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Section 118.053 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(27), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 119.054. ADMINISTRATIVE ATTACHMENT TO THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM. (a) The network is administratively attached to The University of Texas System.

(b) The University of Texas System shall administer and coordinate the network and provide administrative support to the network as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1123 (H.B. 3781), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Section 118.054 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(27), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 119.055. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The network may accept and administer gifts and grants to fund the network from an individual, corporation, trust, or foundation or the federal government, subject to any limitations or conditions imposed by law.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1123 (H.B. 3781), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Section 118.055 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(27), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 119.056. REPORT. The network shall report the results of the network's efforts, findings, and activities to the legislature, state and federal partners, and other interested entities.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1123 (H.B. 3781), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Section 118.056 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(27), eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER C. ADVISORY COUNCIL

Sec. 119.101. ADVISORY COUNCIL. The network shall establish an advisory council to advise the network on the health care needs of this state.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1123 (H.B. 3781), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Section 118.101 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(27), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 119.102. COMPOSITION OF ADVISORY COUNCIL. The advisory council is composed of:

(1) members who are appointed by an executive officer of The University of Texas System and nominated by participants in the network and who are:

(A) state and national leaders in population health;

(B) experts in traditional public health and medical fields; and

(C) leaders in the fields of behavioral health, business, insurance, philanthropy, education, and health law and policy; and

(2) representatives from the department and the commission, selected by the executive head of the agency.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1123 (H.B. 3781), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Section 118.102 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(27), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 119.103. TERMS. Members of the advisory council serve staggered three-year terms, with the terms of one-third of the members expiring on January 1 of each year.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1123 (H.B. 3781), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Section 118.103 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(27), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 119.104. PRESIDING OFFICER. The executive officer of The University of Texas System who appoints members to the advisory council shall appoint a presiding officer from among the members to serve a one-year term.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1123 (H.B. 3781), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Section 118.104 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(27), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 119.105. MEETINGS. The advisory council shall meet at the call of the presiding officer or at other times that the council determines are necessary or appropriate.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1123 (H.B. 3781), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Section 118.105 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(27), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 119.106. COMPENSATION AND REIMBURSEMENT. A member of the advisory council may not receive compensation for service on the advisory council but may be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred by the member while conducting the business of the advisory council, if funds are available for that purpose, as provided by the General Appropriations Act.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1123 (H.B. 3781), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Section 118.106 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(27), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 119.107. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAW. Chapter 2110, Government Code, does not apply to the advisory council.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1123 (H.B. 3781), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Section 118.107 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(27), eff. September 1, 2017.